Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2709
Association; plan of operation; requirements.

(1)(a) The association shall submit to the director a plan of operation and any amendments necessary or suitable to assure the fair, reasonable, and equitable administration of the association. The plan of operation and any amendments shall become effective upon approval in writing by the director.

(b) If the association fails to submit a suitable plan of operation within one hundred eighty days following August 24, 1975, or if at any time thereafter the association fails to submit suitable amendments to the plan, the director shall, after notice and hearing, adopt and promulgate such reasonable rules and regulations as are necessary or advisable to effectuate the Nebraska Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association Act. Such rules and regulations shall continue in force until modified by the director or superseded by a plan submitted by the association and approved by the director.

(2) All member insurers shall comply with the plan of operation.

(3) The plan of operation shall, in addition to requirements enumerated in the Nebraska Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association Act:

(a) Establish procedures for handling the assets of the association;

(b) Establish the amount and method of reimbursing members of the board of directors under section 44-2706;

(c) Establish regular places and times for meetings of the board of directors;

(d) Establish procedures for records to be kept of all financial transactions of the association, its agents, and the board of directors;

(e) Establish the procedures whereby selections for the board of directors shall be made and submitted to the director;

(f) Establish any additional procedures for assessments pursuant to section 44-2708; and

(g) Contain additional provisions necessary or proper for the execution of the powers and duties of the association.

(4) The plan of operation may provide that any or all powers and duties of the association, except those under subdivision (12)(c) of section 44-2707 and section 44-2708, are delegated to a corporation, association, or other organization which performs or will perform functions similar to those of the association, or its equivalent, in two or more states. Such a corporation, association, or organization shall be reimbursed for any payments made on behalf of the association and shall be paid for its performance of any function of the association. A delegation made under this subsection shall take effect only with the approval of both the board of directors and the director and may be made only to a corporation, association, or organization which extends protection not substantially less favorable and effective than that provided by the Nebraska Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association Act.

Laws 1975, LB 217, § 9;

Laws 1986, LB 593, § 9;

Laws 2001, LB 360, § 18.